District of Columbia statutes.
48-841.03

Off-label use of medication.

Before prescribing, administering, or furnishing a prescription medication for an off-label use, a prescriber shall make every reasonable effort to:

(1)

Explain to the patient, in easily understood terms, that the medication is not within the uses approved for that medication by the FDA; and

(2)

Provide the patient with information regarding the potential risks and side effects associated with using the medication for the off-label use.

History

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-131, § 203, 55 DCR 1659

Section References

This section is referenced in § 48-844.03.